Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 77. new text end new text begin Violence prevention services. new text end new text begin Medical assistance covers violence prevention services, as provided in section 256B.0762. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [256B.0762] VIOLENCE PREVENTION SERVICES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply. new text end new text begin (b) "Provider" means a violence prevention services provider that meets the standards established by the Health Alliance for Violence Intervention or an equivalent accrediting organization. new text end new text begin (c) "Violence prevention services" means services provided to promote improved health outcomes and positive behavioral and environmental change, prevent injury and recidivism, and reduce the likelihood that individuals who are victims of community violence will commit or promote violence themselves. new text end new text begin (d) "Violence prevention professional" means an individual certified by the Health Alliance for Violence Intervention or an equivalent accrediting organization to provide violence prevention services. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Provider requirements. new text end new text begin To be eligible to receive reimbursement for the provision of violence prevention services, a provider must: new text end new text begin (1) meet qualifications to bill as a medical assistance provider or to provide services under contract with a medical assistance provider; new text end new text begin (2) ensure that all supervisors of violence prevention professionals have been certified by the Health Alliance for Violence Intervention or an equivalent accrediting organization as violence prevention professionals and have been providing violence prevention services for a minimum of two years; and new text end new text begin (3) show and maintain evidence that all violence prevention professionals employed by or under contract with the provider are certified by the Health Alliance for Violence Intervention or an equivalent accrediting organization. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Settings. new text end new text begin Violence prevention services may be provided in any setting. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Recipient eligibility; criteria for coverage of services. new text end new text begin (a) To be eligible for violence prevention services, a recipient must: new text end new text begin (1) have received medical treatment for an injury sustained due to an act of community violence or be experiencing physical or mental illness symptoms due to exposure to community violence; new text end new text begin (2) be referred for violence prevention services, as part of a determination of medical necessity and coverage, by a physician or other qualified licensed health care practitioner based on a determination that the recipient is at elevated risk of a violent injury or retaliation resulting from another act of community violence; and new text end new text begin (3) meet the criteria in the Minnesota health care programs provider manual for enrollee eligibility for violence prevention services. new text end new text begin (b) The services recommended through referral under paragraph (a), clause (2), must: new text end new text begin (1) meet the criteria for preventive services as specified in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 440.130(c); new text end new text begin (2) be within the practitioner's scope of practice under state law; and new text end new text begin (3) be designed to prevent further impacts of community violence, prevent future community violence, prolong life, and promote the physical and mental health of the individual. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Payment rate. new text end new text begin (a) Effective January 1, 2026, the violence prevention services rate for services provided by a certified violence prevention professional must be at least $25 for each 15-minute unit of service. This rate must be adjusted annually for inflation as provided in subdivision 6. new text end new text begin (b) Services eligible for coverage as violence prevention services include: new text end new text begin (1) screening; new text end new text begin (2) assessment of needs; new text end new text begin (3) development of an individualized service plan; new text end new text begin (4) peer support; new text end new text begin (5) counseling, including counseling to address and mitigate the impacts of trauma; new text end new text begin (6) mentorship; new text end new text begin (7) conflict mediation; new text end new text begin (8) crisis intervention; new text end new text begin (9) patient education; new text end new text begin (10) discharge planning; new text end new text begin (11) documentation; new text end new text begin (12) transportation necessary to access services; new text end new text begin (13) care coordination services meeting the criteria in paragraph (c); and new text end new text begin (14) any additional services listed as violence prevention services in the Minnesota health care programs provider manual. new text end new text begin (c) Care coordination services must be part of community violence prevention services and must facilitate the recipient's access to appropriate services, including medical, behavioral health, social, and other necessary services. These services must be designed to prevent further impacts of community violence, prevent future community violence, prolong life, and promote the recipient's physical and mental health, in accordance with the individualized service plan. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Rate adjustments. new text end new text begin Effective for rate years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall adjust payment rates for violence prevention services annually for inflation using the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Medicare Economic Index, as forecasted in the second quarter of the calendar year before the rate year. The inflation adjustment must be based on the 12-month period from the midpoint of the previous rate year to the midpoint of the rate year for which the rate is being determined. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin REPORT ON VIOLENCE PREVENTION SERVICES.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of human services shall report on medical assistance coverage of violence prevention services to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over health and human services finance and policy. The commissioner shall submit an initial report by February 1, 2028, and a final report by February 1, 2029. new text end new text begin (b) The reports must include but are not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) a list of the violence prevention service providers in Minnesota and the number of service recipients; new text end new text begin (2) the estimated return on investment, including health care savings due to reduced hospitalizations; new text end new text begin (3) the percentage of client goals met; new text end new text begin (4) follow-up information, if available, on whether repeat violent injuries decreased since violence prevention services were provided, compared to the period before the services were provided; and new text end new text begin (5) any other information that can be used to determine the effectiveness of violence prevention services and their funding, including recommendations for improvements to medical assistance coverage of violence prevention services. new text end